lt-LT: Futbolo kamuolio skyriaus tipas: Kamuolio tinklelio laikiklis; Nuimamas kamuolio krepšys; Išorinė tinklinė kišenė; Vidinis kamuolio skyrius; Nėra; Kita
cs: Typ přihrádky na fotbalový míč: Síťka na míč; Odnímatelný vak na míč; Vnější síťovaná kapsa; Vnitřní přihrádka na míč; Žádný; Jiné
pl: Typ przegrody na piłkę do piłki nożnej: Siatka na piłkę; Odpinana torba na piłkę; Zewnętrzna kieszeń z siatki; Wewnętrzna przegroda na piłkę; Brak; Inny
en: Soccer ball compartment type: Ball net holder; Detachable ball bag; External mesh pocket; Internal ball compartment; None; Other
zh-CN: 足球收纳仓类型: 球网袋; 可拆卸球袋; 外部网眼袋; 内置球袋; 无; 其他
it: Tipo di scomparto per pallone da calcio: Rete porta pallone; Borsa per pallone staccabile; Tasca esterna in rete; Scomparto interno per pallone; Nessuno; Altro
nb: Type fotballrom: Ballnettholder; Avtakbar ballpose; Utvendig nettinglomme; Innvendig ballrom; Ingen; Annet
fi: Jalkapallolokeron tyyppi: Palloverkko; Irrotettava pallokassi; Ulkoinen verkkotasku; Sisäinen pallotasku; Ei mitään; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta prekata za nogometno žogo: Nosilec mreže za žoge; Snemljiva torba za žoge; Zunanji mrežast žep; Notranji predal za žoge; Brez; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип отделение за футболна топка: Мрежа за топка; Подвижна чанта за топка; Външен мрежест джоб; Вътрешно отделение за топка; Няма; Друго
pt-BR: Bola de futebol compartimento tipo: Rede de suporte para bola; Bolsa para bola removível; Bolso de malha externo; Compartimento interno para bola; Nenhum; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta odjeljka za nogometnu loptu: Mrežasti držač za loptu; Odvojiva torba za loptu; Vanjski mrežasti džep; Unutarnji odjeljak za loptu; Bez; Ostalo
ja: サッカーボール収納タイプ: ボールネットホルダー; 取り外し可能ボールバッグ; 外部メッシュポケット; 内部ボールコンパートメント; なし; その他
es: Tipo compartimento para balones de fútbol: Soporte de red para balón; Bolsa para balón desmontable; Bolsillo de malla externo; Compartimento para balón interno; Ninguno; Otro
ko: 축구공 수납함 유형: 공 그물 홀더; 분리형 공 가방; 외부 메시 포켓; 내부 공 보관함; 없음; 기타
vi: Loại ngăn đựng bóng đá: Lưới đựng bóng; Túi đựng bóng tháo rời; Ngăn lưới bên ngoài; Ngăn đựng bóng bên trong; Không có; Khác
ru: Тип отделения для футбольного мяча: Держатель-сетка для мяча; Съёмная сумка для мяча; Внешний сетчатый карман; Внутреннее отделение для мяча; Нет; Другое
tr: Futbol topu bölmesi tipi: Top filesi tutucu; Ayrılabilir top çantası; Harici file cep; Dahili top bölmesi; Yok; Diğer
fr: Type de compartiment pour ballon de football: Filet porte-ballon; Sac à ballon détachable; Poche extérieure en filet; Compartiment interne pour ballon; Aucun; Autre
sk-SK: Typ priehradky na futbalovú loptu: Držiak na sieť na lopty; Odnímateľná taška na lopty; Vonkajšie sieťované vrecko; Vnútorná priehradka na lopty; Žiadna; Iná
hu: Focilabda-tartórekesz típusa: Labdatartó háló; Levehető labdatartó táska; Külső hálós zseb; Belső labdatartó rekesz; Nincs; Egyéb
da: Rumtype for fodbold: Holder til boldnet; Aftagelig boldtaske; Udvendig netlomme; Indvendigt boldrum; Ingen; Andet
de: Art des Fußballfachs: Ballnetz-Halterung; Abnehmbare Balltasche; Äußere Netztasche; Internes Ballfach; Keine; Andere
zh-TW: 足球隔層類型: 球網袋; 可拆卸球袋; 外部網袋; 內部置球夾層; 無; 其他
sv: Typ av fack för fotboll: Bollnätshållare; Löstagbar bollväska; Utvändig nätficka; Invändigt bollfack; Ingen; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de compartiment pentru minge de fotbal: Plasament pentru minge; Geantă detașabilă pentru minge; Buzunar exterior din plasă; Compartiment interior pentru minge; Fără; Altele
th: ประเภทช่องใส่ลูกฟุตบอล: ที่ใส่ลูกบอลแบบตาข่าย; กระเป๋าใส่ลูกบอลแบบถอดได้; กระเป๋าตาข่ายด้านนอก; ช่องใส่ลูกบอลด้านใน; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
nl: Voetbal compartimenttype: Balnethouder; Afneembare baltas; Gaasvak buitenkant; Intern balvak; Geen; Anders
el: Τύπος θήκης για μπάλα ποδοσφαίρου: Δίχτυ για μπάλα; Αποσπώμενη τσάντα για μπάλα; Εξωτερική διχτυωτή τσέπη; Εσωτερική θήκη για μπάλα; Κανένα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de compartimento para bola de futebol: Suporte de rede para bola; Saco de bola amovível; Bolso de rede externo; Compartimento interno para bola; Nenhum; Outro